my_app/dictionaries/hunspell-la/la_LA.dic
abietis/d
abnegatoris/d
abscisionis/d
absurditatis/d
acceptilationis/d
Acconis/d
acerbitudinis/d
acoris/d
actoris/d
addictoris/d
adfictionis/d
adgeniculationis/d
adinventionis/d
adlevationis/d
admirabilitatis/d
adnotationis/d
adorationis/d
adpetonis/d
adsectatoris/d
adsignificationis/d
adtestatoris/d
adulteritatis/d
adversitoris/d
aegocerotis/d
aeonis/d
aequivocationis/d
Aesonis/d
affabilitatis/d
afflictatoris/d
aggeniculationis/d
agnationis/d
alatoris/d
Alcippis/d
alienitatis/d
allisionis/d
alternationis/d
amandationis/d
ambaginis/d
amitis/d
Amphionis/d
amsedentis/dfg
Ancalitis/d
anhelationis/d
annexionis/d
anteambulonis/d
anthedonis/d
antistitis/d
apicis/d
apparatoris/d
applicationis/d
aquaeductionis/d
arbitrationis/d
archisacerdotis/d
Aris/d
Ariarathis/d
armatoris/d
arrogationis/d
Aruntis/d
asparsionis/d
assectationis/d
assestricis/d
astaginis/d
Astyanactis/d
Atrebatis/df
attractionis/d
aucupatoris/d
Aulonis/d
Ausonis/d
Autrigonis/d
avocatoris/d
bacchationis/d
ballonis/d
battuatoris/d
bellionis/d
bibitionis/d
bisontis/d
Blemyis/d
botrionis/d
Brigantis/d
bulbationis/d
cacatoris/d
Caepionis/d
calationis/d
calculatricis/d
callithricis/d
Cambysis/d
cantatoris/d
caponis/d
captricis/d
carinatoris/d
Carontis/d
castoris/d
Caturigis/d
cavillationis/d
celibis/de
censitoris/d
cepionidis/d
cerycis/d
chamaeleonis/d
Chelidonis/d
chronocratoris/d
cimussationis/d
circumitoris/d
circumfossionis/d
circumpedis/de
circumvolutionis/d
clamatoris/d
Cleanthis/d
cnodacis/d
coangustationis/d
cocturnicis/d
cognationis/d
collectoris/d
comessationis/d
comminatoris/d
comparatoris/d
compositoris/d
concentoris/d
concubitionis/d
conexionis/d
confornicationis/d
coniugationis/d
conmanipulationis/d
conmorationis/d
conpedis/df
conpressoris/d
consanguinitatis/d
consitoris/d
constuprationis/d
contemptionis/d
conturbationis/d
coordinationis/d
correlationis/d
crassatoris/d
criminatoris/d
cudonis/d
Curculionis/d
cynopis/d
debitoris/d
decretionis/d
defletionis/d
delatronis/d
delphinis/d
denominationis/d
depolitionis/d
derisionis/d
despicationis/d
detestationis/d
diatis/d
diiudicationis/d
Diomedis/d
discretionis/d
dispunctionis/d
dissuasoris/d
divinatoris/d
dominatoris/d
ducationis/d
dyserotis/de
echinopodis/d
effossionis/d
elinguationis/d
emplastrationis/d
epulationis/d
erroris/d
Eumedis/d
evitationis/d
exauctorationis/d
excreationis/d
exesoris/d
exornationis/d
expositionis/d
exsectionis/d
extentionis/d
fabrificationis/d
famis/d
favoris/d
festivitatis/d
finitoris/d
flexuositatis/d
formicationis/d
fraternitatis/d
frumentatoris/d
fumationis/d
gannitionis/d
germanitatis/d
globositatis/d
granomastigis/d
gustatoris/d
Halyattis/d
Heliconis/d
hiemis/d
homuncionis/d
hydrophylacis/d
iasponychis/d
illiberalitatis/d
immensitatis/d
imperatoris/d
improbationis/d
incensionis/d
incongruitatis/d
indagationis/d
infamatoris/d
informitatis/d
iniectionis/d
inmemoris/de
inparationis/d
inpressioris/d
inrequietis/d
insertionis/d
instigatricis/d
intensionis/d
internoctationis/d
intextionis/d
invisoris/d
irreligiositatis/d
iudicis/d
iuvenis/dq
Laenatis/d
Laocoontis/d
latratoris/d
legirupionis/d
levigationis/d
ligonis/d
litigatricis/d
lubidinitatis/d
lusionis/d
macritatis/d
malleatoris/d
marmorationis/d
meconis/d
memoratricis/d
meridiationis/d
Mimallonis/d
missoris/d
molliginis/d
morsicationis/d
pluris/defg
mutitationis/d
natricis/d
nepotis/d
nocticoloris/de
nugatoris/d
Oarionis/d
obliteratoris/d
observatricis/d
obumbatricis/d
odorationis/d
ominationis/d
oppilationis/d
ordinatioris/d
ostentationis/d
paeonis/d
panticis/d
parturitionis/d
pacis/d
penetrationis/d
perdivitis/ders
Periphantis/d
perpetuitatis/d
perturbatoris/d
Phaedonis/d
phragmitis/d
pinguedinis/d
plangoris/d
Plutonis/d
Polydegmonis/d
porculationis/d
potitoris/d
praecognitoris/d
praegustatoris/d
praeposterationis/d
praesultoris/d
primatis/d
procupidinis/d
profunditatis/d
pronuntiationis/d
proquaestoris/d
provectionis/d
pugillationis/d
purgatricis/d
Pythionis/d
quinquennalitatis/d
ratihabitionis/d
recitationis/d
redemptionis/d
refutationis/d
reluctationis/d
renuntiatricis/d
reprobatoris/d
responsionis/d
retractionis/d
rhetoris/d
roris/d
runconis/d
sagochlamydis/d
salutis/d
saporis/d
saturitatis/d
scinifis/d
scrutatoris/d
segnitatis/d
semuncideuncis/d
septionis/d
sesquipedis/d
silonis/d
Siredonis/d
solidationis/d
Soractis/d
spectabilitatis/d
sponstricis/d
sterilitatis/d
stratoris/d
suavisatoris/d
subicis/d
subplantationis/d
subulonis/d
sudatricis/d
summatis/d
superlinitionis/d
suppressionis/d
susurrationis/d
talabarrionis/d
Telluris/d
tenuationis/d
tetricitatis/d
thieldonis/d
Timonis/d
tortoris/d
transducis/d
Trebiatis/d
tripudiationis/d
tubicinis/d
turpidinis/d
ultionis/d
urbanitatis/d
vacillationis/d
vasonis/d
venationis/d
Vercingetorigis/d
vesticipis/d
victoris/d
virgatoris/d
vitulationis/d
vomacis/ders
Zoroastris/d
accvmvlatoris/d
adlvtionis/d
adtvrationis/d
aeqvipedis/de
Amazonidvm/d
aposcopevontis/d
Arvntis/d
avcvpis/d
avrigatoris/d
avvlsoris/d
bvllionis/d
Cavlonis/d
circvmcisionis/d
circvmspectoris/d
collavdatoris/d
complvtoris/d
confvtationis/d
conmvnicationis/d
consecvtionis/d
contribvtionis/d
crvcifixionis/d
cvnicvlatoris/d
cvrvitatis/d
deivrationis/d
destrvctoris/d
discvssioris/de
docvmentationis/d
dvratoris/d
eliqvationis/d
esvriginis/d
exaeqvationis/d
exeqvvtionis/d
exsvltationis/d
favtricis/d
freqventationis/d
fvllonis/d
fvtvtricis/d
gvttoris/d
hvmanitatis/d
immvtabilitatis/d
incorrvptionis/d
inflvxionis/d
inocvlationis/d
insensvalitatis/d
interpvnctionis/d
ivdicis/d
ivvenitatis/d
Levcanthis/d
lvcrionis/d
macritvdinis/d
mvcilaginis/d
mvnitoris/d
navsiatoris/d
nvncvpatoris/d
obscvritatis/d
vpilionis/d
pellvciditatis/d
persecvtoris/d
plvtoris/d
praenvntiatricis/d
prolocvtionis/d
pvberis/de
pvltationis/d
qvadripartitionis/d
rabvlationis/d
renvntiationis/d
resvscitatoris/d
rvncatoris/d
savcietatis/d
sensvalitatis/d
solvtoris/d
strenvitatis/d
svbdistinctionis/d
svbmigrationis/d
svbscriptionis/d
svccisoris/d
svffragatricis/d
svperatricis/d
svpinationis/d
svsceptionis/d
temeritvdinis/d
transsvmptionis/d
tvitoris/d
tvtatoris/d
vngvis/dfq
vtilitatis/d
voltvris/d
aduelitationis/d
auiditatis/d
ceruicis/d
conuexitatis/d
deuexitatis/d
eneruationis/d
fuluoris/d
inuasionis/d
lasciuiatis/d
nouitatis/d
peruectoris/d
prouectionis/d
saeuitudinis/d
subuectionis/d
uagoris/d
uaticinatoris/d
ueneratoris/d
uerticis/d
uicarietatis/d
uinositatis/d
uitiliginis/d
uomacis/ders
